Maine, session 132, LD553.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §2, as amended by PL 1973, c. 513, §22 and c. 525, is further
amended to read:
§2. Offshore waters and submerged land
The jurisdiction of this State shall extend extends to and over, and be is exercisable
with respect to, waters offshore from the coasts of this State as follows:
1. Marginal Territorial sea. The marginal territorial sea to its outermost limits as
said the limits may from time to time be defined or recognized by the United States of
America by international treaty Department of Commerce or otherwise;
1-A. Territorial waters. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State owns and may exercise jurisdiction over and control all waters within the rise and fall
of the tide seaward 12 nautical miles; and
2. High seas. The high seas to whatever extent jurisdiction therein may be claimed
by the United States of America, or to whatever extent may be recognized by the usages
and customs of international law or by any agreement, international or otherwise, to which
the United States of America or this State may be party;
2-A. --harvesting Harvesting. The State of Maine declares that it owns and shall
control controls the harvesting of the living resources of the seas adjoining the coastline for
a distance of 200 12 miles or to the furthest edge of the Continental Shelf, whichever is
greater, subject only to the boundary with Canada. Control over the harvesting of these
living resources shall must be by licenses or permits issued by the Department of Marine
Resources;.
3. Submerged lands. All submerged lands, including the subsurface thereof, lying
under said aforementioned waters.
Page 1 - 132LR0609(01)

Sec. 2. Actions by Office of Attorney General; report. The Office of the
Attorney General shall take all actions necessary to assert the State's sovereignty over and
ownership of offshore waters and the harvesting of the living resources of the seas from
those waters consistent with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 1, section 2, including, but
not limited to, engaging in negotiations with the United States Department of Commerce
or other entities concerning that sovereignty and ownership and, if necessary, the filing of
litigation concerning that sovereignty and ownership. By May 1, 2025, the Office of the
Attorney General shall submit to the Joint Standing Committee on Marine Resources a
report outlining the progress of actions taken by the office pursuant to this section.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.